public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A èser esaroni/M èser
SFX A èser esaronse èser
SFX A èser esarà/JLNR èser
SFX A èser esaràe/R èser
SFX A èser esarè/JL èser
SFX A èser esarèmi/K èser
SFX A èser esaré/P èser
SFX A èser esarémoi/M èser
SFX A èser esarésimo/L èser
SFX A èser esarésimoi/M èser
SFX A èser esaréu/Q èser
SFX A èser esarí/P èser
SFX A èser esaría/JLNR èser
SFX A èser esaríami/K èser
SFX A èser esaríatu/O èser
SFX A èser esaríe/JLR èser
SFX A èser esaríelo/S èser
SFX A èser esaríemi/K èser
SFX A èser esarímoi/M èser
SFX A èser esaríu/Q èser
SFX A èser esarò/JL èser
SFX A èser esaròmi/K èser
SFX A èser esede èser
SFX A èser esege èser
SFX A èser eseme/H èser
SFX A èser esemo/L èser
SFX A èser esen/L èser
SFX A èser esendo/E èser
SFX A èser esene èser
SFX A èser eseni/M èser
SFX A èser esense èser
SFX A èser esente/ èser
SFX A èser eseralo/S èser
SFX A èser eserami/K èser
SFX A èser eseratu/O èser
SFX A èser eserave/RT èser
SFX A èser eseremo/L èser
SFX A èser eseren/L èser
SFX A èser esereni/M èser
SFX A èser eserense èser
SFX A èser eseresi/P èser
SFX A èser eseresiu/Q èser
SFX A èser eserimo/L èser
SFX A èser eserion/L èser
SFX A èser eserioni/M èser
SFX A èser eserionse èser
SFX A èser eserisen/L èser
SFX A èser eseriseni/M èser
SFX A èser eserisense èser
SFX A èser eserision/L èser
SFX A èser eserisioni/M èser
SFX A èser eserisionse èser
SFX A èser eserisié/P èser
SFX A èser eserisiéu/Q èser
SFX A èser eserison/L èser
SFX A èser eserisoni/M èser
SFX A èser eserisonse èser
SFX A èser eserié/P èser
SFX A èser eseriéu/Q èser
SFX A èser eseron/L èser
SFX A èser eseroni/M èser
SFX A èser eseronse èser
SFX A èser eserà/JLNR èser
SFX A èser eseràe/R èser
SFX A èser eserè/JL èser
SFX A èser eserèmi/K èser
SFX A èser eseré/P èser
SFX A èser eserémoi/M èser
SFX A èser eserésimo/L èser
SFX A èser eserésimoi/M èser
SFX A èser eseréu/Q èser
SFX A èser eserí/P èser
SFX A èser esería/JLNR èser
SFX A èser eseríami/K èser
SFX A èser eseríatu/O èser
SFX A èser eseríe/JLR èser
SFX A èser eseríelo/S èser
SFX A èser eseríemi/K èser
SFX A èser eserímoi/M èser
SFX A èser eseríu/Q èser
SFX A èser eserò/JL èser
SFX A èser eseròmi/K èser
SFX A èser esese/I èser
SFX A èser esesi èser
SFX A èser esesta/I èser
SFX A èser eseste/I èser
SFX A èser esesti/I èser
SFX A èser esesto/I èser
SFX A èser eseva/JLPR èser
SFX A èser eseve/JL èser
SFX A èser esevi/NP èser
SFX A èser esevo/JL èser
SFX A èser esime/H èser
SFX A èser esimo/L èser
SFX A èser esion/L èser
SFX A èser esione èser
SFX A èser esioni/M èser
SFX A èser esionse èser
SFX A èser esisen/L èser
SFX A èser esisene èser
SFX A èser esiseni/M èser
SFX A èser esisense èser
SFX A èser esision/L èser
SFX A èser esisione èser
SFX A èser esisioni/M èser
SFX A èser esisionse èser
SFX A èser esisié/P èser
SFX A èser esisiéde/P èser
SFX A èser esisiége/P èser
SFX A èser esison/L èser
SFX A èser esisone èser
SFX A èser esisoni/M èser
SFX A èser esisonse èser
SFX A èser esiven/L èser
SFX A èser esiveni/M èser
SFX A èser esivense èser
SFX A èser esivion/L èser
SFX A èser esivioni/M èser
SFX A èser esivionse èser
SFX A èser esivié/P èser
SFX A èser esiviéu/Q èser
SFX A èser esivon/L èser
SFX A èser esivoni/M èser
SFX A èser esivonse èser
SFX A èser esié/P èser
SFX A èser esiéde/P èser
SFX A èser esiége/P èser
SFX A èser esiéu/Q èser
SFX A èser eson/L èser
SFX A èser esone èser
SFX A èser esoni/M èser
SFX A èser esonse èser
SFX A èser esuda èser
SFX A èser esude èser
SFX A èser esudi èser
SFX A èser esudo èser
SFX A èser esé/FP èser
SFX A èser eséa/JLPR èser
SFX A èser eséami/K èser
SFX A èser eséau/Q èser
SFX A èser esée/JL èser
SFX A èser eséelo/S èser
SFX A èser eséemi/K èser
SFX A èser eséi/NP èser
SFX A èser eséimo/L èser
SFX A èser eséimoi/M èser
SFX A èser eséitu/O èser
SFX A èser esémoi/M èser
SFX A èser eséndome/G èser
SFX A èser eséndomene/G èser
SFX A èser eséo/JL èser
SFX A èser eséomi/K èser
SFX A èser esésimo èser
SFX A èser eséu/Q èser
SFX A èser esévami/K èser
SFX A èser esévau/Q èser
SFX A èser esévelo/S èser
SFX A èser esévemi/K èser
SFX A èser esévimo/L èser
SFX A èser esévimoi/M èser
SFX A èser esévitu/O èser
SFX A èser esévomi/K èser
SFX A èser esí/FP èser
SFX A èser esímoi/M èser
SFX A èser esíu/Q èser
SFX A èser esú/ èser
SFX A èser esúa èser
SFX A èser esúe èser
SFX A èser esúi èser
SFX A èser esúo èser
SFX A èser furese/I èser
SFX A èser furesen/L èser
SFX A èser furesene èser
SFX A èser fureseni/M èser
SFX A èser furesense èser
SFX A èser furesi èser
SFX A èser furesion/L èser
SFX A èser furesione èser
SFX A èser furesioni/M èser
SFX A èser furesionse èser
SFX A èser furesisen/L èser
SFX A èser furesisene èser
SFX A èser furesiseni/M èser
SFX A èser furesisense èser
SFX A èser furesision/L èser
SFX A èser furesisione èser
SFX A èser furesisioni/M èser
SFX A èser furesisionse èser
SFX A èser furesisié/P èser
SFX A èser furesisiéde/P èser
SFX A èser furesisiége/P èser
SFX A èser furesison/L èser
SFX A èser furesisone èser
SFX A èser furesisoni/M èser
SFX A èser furesisonse èser
SFX A èser furesié/P èser
SFX A èser furesiéde/P èser
SFX A èser furesiége/P èser
SFX A èser fureson/L èser
SFX A èser furesone èser
SFX A èser furesoni/M èser
SFX A èser furesonse èser
SFX A èser furésimo èser
SFX A èser fuse/I èser
SFX A èser fusen/L èser
SFX A èser fusene èser
SFX A èser fuseni/M èser
SFX A èser fusense èser
SFX A èser fusi èser
SFX A èser fusion/L èser
SFX A èser fusione èser
SFX A èser fusioni/M èser
SFX A èser fusionse èser
SFX A èser fusisen/L èser
SFX A èser fusisene èser
SFX A èser fusiseni/M èser
SFX A èser fusisense èser
SFX A èser fusision/L èser
SFX A èser fusisione èser
SFX A èser fusisioni/M èser
SFX A èser fusisionse èser
SFX A èser fusisié/P èser
SFX A èser fusisiéde/P èser
SFX A èser fusisiége/P èser
SFX A èser fusison/L èser
SFX A èser fusisone èser
SFX A èser fusisoni/M èser
SFX A èser fusisonse èser
SFX A èser fusié/P èser
SFX A èser fusiéde/P èser
SFX A èser fusiége/P èser
SFX A èser fuson/L èser
SFX A èser fusone èser
SFX A èser fusoni/M èser
SFX A èser fusonse èser
SFX A èser fúsimo èser
SFX A èser jèra/JLPR èser
SFX A èser jèrami/K èser
SFX A èser jèrau/Q èser
SFX A èser jère/JL èser
SFX A èser jèrelo/S èser
SFX A èser jèremi/K èser
SFX A èser jèri/NP èser
SFX A èser jèrimo/L èser
SFX A èser jèrimoi/M èser
SFX A èser jèritu/O èser
SFX A èser jèro/JL èser
SFX A èser jèromi/K èser
SFX A èser saralo/S èser
SFX A èser sarami/K èser
SFX A èser saratu/O èser
SFX A èser sarave/RT èser
SFX A èser saremo/L èser
SFX A èser saren/L èser
SFX A èser sareni/M èser
SFX A èser sarense èser
SFX A èser saresi/P èser
SFX A èser saresiu/Q èser
SFX A èser sarimo/L èser
SFX A èser sarion/L èser
SFX A èser sarioni/M èser
SFX A èser sarionse èser
SFX A èser sarisen/L èser
SFX A èser sariseni/M èser
SFX A èser sarisense èser
SFX A èser sarision/L èser
SFX A èser sarisioni/M èser
SFX A èser sarisionse èser
SFX A èser sarisié/P èser
SFX A èser sarisiéu/Q èser
SFX A èser sarison/L èser
SFX A èser sarisoni/M èser
SFX A èser sarisonse èser
SFX A èser sarié/P èser
SFX A èser sariéu/Q èser
SFX A èser saron/L èser
SFX A èser saroni/M èser
SFX A èser saronse èser
SFX A èser sarà/JLNR èser
SFX A èser saràe/R èser
SFX A èser sarè/JL èser
SFX A èser sarèmi/K èser
SFX A èser saré/P èser
SFX A èser sarémoi/M èser
SFX A èser sarésimo/L èser
SFX A èser sarésimoi/M èser
SFX A èser saréu/Q èser
SFX A èser sarí/P èser
SFX A èser saría/JLNR èser
SFX A èser saríami/K èser
SFX A èser saríatu/O èser
SFX A èser saríe/JLR èser
SFX A èser saríelo/S èser
SFX A èser saríemi/K èser
SFX A èser sarímoi/M èser
SFX A èser saríu/Q èser
SFX A èser sarò/JL èser
SFX A èser saròmi/K èser
SFX A èser selo/S èser
SFX A èser seme/H èser
SFX A èser semo/L èser
SFX A èser sen/L èser
SFX A èser seni/M èser
SFX A èser seralo/S èser
SFX A èser serami/K èser
SFX A èser seratu/O èser
SFX A èser serave/RT èser
SFX A èser seremo/L èser
SFX A èser seren/L èser
SFX A èser sereni/M èser
SFX A èser serense èser
SFX A èser seresi/P èser
SFX A èser seresiu/Q èser
SFX A èser serimo/L èser
