public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
afanar/A
albidar/A
alteriđar/A
inamidar/A
inaneƚar/A
ardir/A
arxenar/A
aromatixar/A
subastar/A
aŧetar/A
autorixar/A
axitar/A
bagajar/A
inbajokar/A
traxbalar/A
inbalokar/A
balordir/A
rexbalŧar/A
inbanboƚar/A
xbankar/A
baratar/A
bardar/A
barufar/A
rebàter/A
rebatixar/A
dexbaular/A
xbavidar/A
inbekar/A
xberegar/A
xbetegar/A
bevusar/A
xbianŧar/A
xbilanŧar/A
xbingoƚar/A
biskar/A
blokar/A
xbójer/A
trabokar/A
rebolar/A
xbolsar/A
rebondolar/A
abordar/A
xborosar/A
xbotegar/A
abosar/A
inboxemar/A
bragetar/A
xbranar/A
brasoƚar/A
abreviar/A
xbrindoƚar/A
dexbrojar/A
bronbolar/A
inbrumar/A
xbudeƚar/A
buratar/A
rebutar/A
xbuxinar/A
scapinar/A
cefar/A
decèñer/A
inkoncéñer/A
cicolar/A
scoketar/A
dar/A	po:verb
dameɉar/A
defamar/A
derenar/A
dexinar/A
distribuir/A
indoar/A
dolorar/A
domenar/A
redopiar/A
adosar/A
dreŧar/A
aduƚar/A
inđalir/A
xavaɉar/A
dogar/A
xogoƚar/A
konxónxer/A
xornalixar/A
đugatolar/A
sperdurar/A
eklisar/A
emular/A
erpegar/A
eternidar/A
exersitar/A
konfar/A
fadegar/A
faƚar/A
sfalsar/A
famejarixar/A
faoređar/A
infatuar/A
fasionar/A
scarifegar/A
ratifegar/A
infeltronar/A
ferar/A
inferetar/A
fetar/A
desfiamar/A
fiaskedar/A
fifotar/A
defiƚar/A
fiƚoxofar/A
fiolar/A
fiosinar/A
fiskaƚixar/A
konfluir/A
sfogar/A
refoƚar/A
infoñar/A
formar/A
informigolar/A
raforsar/A
infradeƚar/A
frankar/A
frapoƚar/A
fraternidar/A
infraxar/A
frenar/A
sfríder/A
frondedar/A
frustar/A
sfulminar/A
sfuregar/A
fúxer/A
gaƚar/A
galidar/A
galopar/A
xganbarar/A
xgañolir/A
garbixar/A
xgarofolar/A
gavasar/A
ingetar/A
godegar/A
gongoƚar/A
dexgoŧar/A
xgrameñar/A
grandedar/A
grapar/A
regrasiar/A
gredar/A
ingremir/A
xgretolir/A
ingrinsar/A
ingriŧolir/A
xgrosar/A
guarentar/A
exibir/A
infornar/A
insir/A
intrar/A
ipotiđar/A
ɉaŧar/A
jelomarar/A
injotar/A
ɉugular/A
inkaenaŧar/A
kaligar/A
skaltrir/A
kanar/A
deskankarar/A
kañar/A
inkaprisiar/A
skarkajar/A
skartar/A
rekaskar/A
inkatigar/A
kauŧionar/A
inkaxar/A
akòɉer/A
koƚegar/A
komenŧiar/A
inkonkar/A
skontar/A
konvoɉar/A
skorajir/A
inkornar/A
kortidar/A
deskovèrđer/A
rekréser/A
kronpar/A
krupoliđar/A
intrakuerar/A
inkular/A
skurtar/A
xlanegar/A
laoratar/A
dexlatar/A
ƚedamar/A
ƚemoxinar/A
xlevar/A
reƚievar/A
liñar/A
traxlokar/A
losar/A
lungar/A
xmafarar/A
xmaƚisiar/A
xmaniar/A
maraveɉar/A
martoriđar/A
mastegar/A
xmaŧar/A
inframexar/A
xmenar/A
meretar/A
traméter/A
diminuir/A
inmojar/A
moltonar/A
moraliđar/A
mormolar/A
promòver/A
murar/A
inmuxonir/A
denegar/A
niŧar/A
denonsiar/A
xñanfiđar/A
ocixar/A
omologar/A
dexonorar/A
oridonar/A
oxar/A
pagar/A
spaƚar/A
spaludar/A
despanocar/A
papuŧar/A
parixar/A
pasar/A
inpastidar/A
strapaŧar/A
pedorar/A
traƚelar/A
spenaŧar/A
inpenolar/A
periodar/A
petar/A
inpetolar/A
inpiagar/A
inpicoƚar/A
piƚotar/A
pirolar/A
piŧegar/A
inpocar/A
spolveriđar/A
sotopóner/A
spontiñar/A
porkexar/A
potenŧiar/A
inpresar/A
inprimar/A
providar/A
purgar/A
skorabiar/A
ranciñar/A
rasar/A
recixar/A
relasionar/A
ribeƚar/A
irisoƚar/A
roesar/A
ronfar/A
derotar/A
rueƚar/A
ruvijar/A
sakosar/A
saliđar/A
sanɉotar/A
insavonar/A
scopiđar/A
segar/A
asejar/A
insemenir/A
konseñar/A
sesoƚar/A
siamar/A
sindakar/A
skajar/A
skarpeƚar/A
iskaturir/A
skivar/A
skrinsar/A
sodar/A
insolentar/A
sonar/A
sotilidar/A
sparañar/A
spergoŧar/A
spigolar/A
despojar/A
malstar/A
starnudar/A
istekar/A
stimar/A
istivaƚar/A
destranir/A
strikar/A
strumar/A
suàder/A
supiar/A
detaɉar/A
takiđar/A
taponar/A
intaskar/A
intaxar/A
sorainténder/A
intentar/A
trateñir/A
otéñer/A
testar/A
stirar/A
coler/A
tonidar/A
tormentar/A
retòrđer/A
protràer/A
trankuilar/A
retratar/A
stremir/A
destrigar/A
tronedar/A
inturbiar/A
insankar/A
séder/A
ŧenjar/A
insercar/A
skonŧertar/A
reŧíder/A
ŧimolar/A
mansipar/A
insokir/A
sotegar/A
umiƚiar/A
evakuar/A
vaƚutar/A
vareŧar/A
vedovar/A
xvelixar/A
vénŧer/A
vèñer/A
verdelar/A
verigolar/A
vertir/A
dexvesar/A
vinar/A
vitalidar/A
vixitar/A
revoler/A
revoltoƚar/A
inxalontrar/A
xbravar/A
inxerir/A
xlankar/A
xoetar/A
ŧonkar/A
recapar/A
antefàxer/A
indúxer/A
ralentar/A
bosolar/A
inxeƚir/A
inserpidir/A
rebekoƚar/A
skarnar/A
xlanbroŧar/A
storđar/A
ardiñar/A
